Illinois, session 104th, SB2104.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Sale 5of Pharmaceuticals on Social Media Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act:7    "Individual" does not include a manufacturer or 8distributor identified on the label of a drug approved under 9the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, a biological product 10licensed under the Public Health Service Act, or a drug 11marketed in accordance with an over-the-counter monograph 12under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.13    "Social media" has the same meaning as defined in Section 146-5 of the Liquor Control Act of 1934. 15    Section 10. Sale of pharmaceuticals on social media; 16verification process. Notwithstanding any other provision of 17law, no individual shall sell or advertise the sale of a 18pharmaceutical on social media unless the individual has 19completed the following verification process:20        (1) the individual shall submit an image of both the 21    front and back of the individual's state-issued 22    identification card to the social media platform upon or   SB2104- 2 -LRB104 03751 SPS 13775 b1    through which the pharmaceutical is to be sold or 2    advertised;3        (2) a disclaimer must be included in any advertisement 4    for the pharmaceutical on the social media platform that 5    clearly discloses the name of the individual selling the 6    pharmaceutical;7        (3) the individual must be identified on the social 8    media page upon which the pharmaceutical is being sold or 9    advertised; and10        (4) the individual must display a disclaimer on the 11    individual's main page on the social media platform 12    stating that the owner or operator sells or advertises the 13    pharmaceutical on that social media platform.